hu: Tartozék rulettkészlet komponensek: Golyó(k); Hordtáska; Zsetonok; Krupié gereblye; Játéktábla; Játékszőnyeg; Jelölők (dolly / korong); Szabályfüzet; Kerék; Egyéb
de: Im Rouletteset enthaltene Komponenten: Kugel(n); Tragekoffer; Chips; Croupier-Rechen; Tableau-Brett; Tableau-Matte; Markierungen (Dolly/Pucks); Regelheft; Rad; Sonstige
es: Componentes del juego de ruleta incluidos: Bolas; Estuche de transporte; Fichas; Rastrillo de crupier; Tablero de juego; Tapete de juego; Marcadores (dolly/discos); Folleto de reglas; Ruleta; Otro
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu do gry w ruletkę: Kulki; Etui; Żetony; Grabki krupierskie; Plansza z układem zakładów; Mata z układem zakładów; Markery (figurki / krążki); Broszura z zasadami; Koło; Inne
ru: Состав набора рулетки: Шарик(и); Кейс для переноски; Фишки; Лопатка крупье; Игровое поле (доска); Игровое поле (сукно); Маркеры (долли/шайбы); Буклет с правилами; Колесо; Другое
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys ruletės rinkinio komponentai: Kamuoliukas (-ai); Nešiojimo dėklas; Žetonai; Krupjė grėblelis; Išdėstymo lenta; Išdėstymo kilimėlis; Žymekliai (rituliai); Taisyklių knygelė; Ratas; Kita
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i rulettsett: Kule(r); Bæreveske; Sjetonger; Sjetongrake; Spillebrett; Spillematte; Markører (dolly/puck); Regelhefte; Hjul; Annet
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm của bộ đồ chơi Roulette: Bóng; Hộp đựng; Chip; Cây cào chip; Bảng cược; Thảm cược; Đánh dấu (dolly/puck); Sổ tay luật chơi; Bàn quay; Khác
fi: Rulettisetin mukana tulevat osat: Pallo(t); Kantolaukku; Pelimerkit; Harava; Pelilauta; Pelimatto; Merkit (dolly/kiekot); Sääntövihko; Pyörä; Muu
zh-CN: 包括轮盘套装组件: 滚球; 手提箱; 筹码; 荷官推筹码杆; 下注板; 下注垫; 标记（透明圆柱/圆盘）; 规则手册; 轮盘; 其他
cs: Komponenty obsažené v sadě rulety: Kuličky; Přenosné pouzdro; Žetony; Hrábě pro krupiéra; Hrací deska; Hrací plátno; Markery (figurky/puky); Pravidla; Kolo; Jiné
ro-RO: Componente incluse în setul de ruletă: Bilă (bile); Cutie de transport; Jetoane; Greblă crupier; Tablă de joc; Covoraș de joc; Markere (dolly/pucuri); Broșură cu reguli; Ruletă; Altele
sl-SI: Standard za montažo rotorja: Kroglica(-e); Prenosni kovček; Žetoni; Grablje za krupjeja; Igralna plošča; Igralna podloga; Označevalci (lutke/ploščki); Knjižica s pravili; Kolo; Drugo
sv: Medföljande komponenter i roulettset: Kula/kulor; Bärväska; Marker; Croupierraka; Spelbräde; Spelduk; Markörer (dolly/puckar); Regelhäfte; Hjul; Övrigt
hr-HR: Uključene komponente seta za rulet: Kuglice; Kovčeg za nošenje; Žetoni; Grablje krupjea; Ploča za igru; Podloga za igru; Oznake (figurice); Knjižica s pravilima; Kolo; Ostalo
it: Componenti del set da roulette inclusi: Palline; Custodia per il trasporto; Fiche; Rastrello da croupier; Tavolo da gioco; Tappeto da gioco; Segnapunti (dolly/puck); Libretto delle regole; Ruota; Altro
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплект рулетка: Топче(та); Куфарче за пренасяне; Чипове; Гребло за крупие; Дъска за залози; Подложка за залози; Маркери (доли/пъкове); Книжка с правила; Колело; Друго
pt-BR: Roleta, componentes incluídos no conjunto: Bola(s); Estojo de transporte; Fichas; Rastelo de crupiê; Placa de layout; Tapete de layout; Marcadores (dolly/pucks); Livreto de regras; Roleta; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα σετ ρουλέτας: Μπίλια (ή μπίλιες); Θήκη μεταφοράς; Μάρκες; Τσουγκράνα κρουπιέρη; Ταμπλό ρουλέτας; Τσόχα (mat) ρουλέτας; Δείκτες (dolly/pucks); Βιβλιαράκι με κανόνες; Τροχός; Άλλο
da: Medfølgende komponenter i roulettesæt: Kugle(r); Bæretaske; Jetoner; Croupier-rive; Spilleplade; Spillemåtte; Markører (dolly/pucks); Regelhæfte; Hjul; Andet
ja: ルーレットセットコンポーネント付き: ボール; キャリングケース; チップ; ディーラーレーキ; レイアウトボード; レイアウトマット; マーカー (ドリー / パック); ルールブックレット; ホイール; その他
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto de roleta incluídos: Bola(s); Estojo de transporte; Fichas; Rastelo do croupier; Tábua de esquema; Tapete de esquema; Marcadores (dolly/pucks); Livro de regras; Roda; Outro
ko: 룰렛 세트 구성품 포함: 공; 휴대용 케이스; 칩; 딜러 레이크; 레이아웃 보드; 레이아웃 매트; 마커(돌리/퍽); 규칙 책자; 휠; 기타
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดรูเล็ตที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ลูกบอล; กระเป๋าพกพา; ชิป; ไม้กวาดชิป; กระดานเลย์เอาต์; เสื่อเลย์เอาต์; มาร์กเกอร์ (ดอลลี่/พัค); สมุดคู่มือกติกา; วงล้อ; อื่นๆ
tr: Dahil olan rulet seti bileşenleri: Top(lar); Taşıma çantası; Fişler; Krupiye tırmığı; Yerleşim panosu; Yerleşim matı; İşaretleyiciler (dolly/diskler); Kurallar kitapçığı; Çark; Diğer
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen roulette-set: Bal(len); Draagkoffer; Fiches; Croupierhark; Speelbord; Speelmat; Markeringen (dolly/pucks); Spelregelboekje; Wiel; Overige
sk-SK: Komponenty ruletovej sady v cene: Guľôčka/guľôčky; Prenosné puzdro; Žetóny; Hrabličky pre krupiéra; Hrací plán (doska); Hracie plátno (podložka); Značkovače (dolly/puck); Brožúra s pravidlami; Ruleta (koleso); Iné
en: Roulette set components included: Ball(s); Carrying case; Chips; Dealer rake; Layout board; Layout mat; Markers (dolly/pucks); Rules booklet; Wheel; Other
fr: Composants du kit de roulette inclus: Bille(s); Mallette de transport; Jetons; Râteau de croupier; Plateau de jeu; Tapis de jeu; Marqueurs (dolly/palets); Livret de règles; Roue; Autre
zh-TW: 包含輪盤組組件: 滾球; 手提箱; 籌碼; 莊家推桿; 佈局板; 佈局墊; 標記 (標記座/籌碼); 規則手冊; 輪盤; 其他